ru: Конструкция серфборда: Карбоновый композит; Пенополистирол/эпоксидная смола; Стекловолокно; Надувная; ПУ/полиэстер; ПВХ-сэндвич; Софт-топ (пена); Деревянный шпон; Другое
fi: Surffilaudan rakenne: Hiilikomposiitti; EPS/epoksi; Lasikuitu; Ilmatäytteinen; PU/polyesteri; PVC-sandwich; Soft-top vaahto; Puuviilu; Muu
ro-RO: Construcție a plăcii de surf: Compozit de carbon; EPS/epoxidic; Fibră de sticlă; Gonflabil; PU/poliester; Sandvici PVC; Spumă cu suprafață moale; Furnir de lemn; Altele
de: Bauart des Surfboards: Carbon-Composite; EPS/Epoxidharz; Fiberglas; Aufblasbar; PU/Polyester; PVC-Sandwich; Soft-Top-Schaumstoff; Holzfurnier; Sonstige
zh-TW: 衝浪板結構: 碳纖維複合材料; EPS/環氧樹脂; 玻璃纖維; 充氣式; PU/聚酯纖維; PVC 夾層; 軟頂泡棉; 木質貼面; 其他
sk-SK: Konštrukcia surfovej dosky: Uhlíkový kompozit; EPS/epoxid; Sklolaminát; Nafukovacie; PU/polyester; PVC sendvič; Pena s mäkkým povrchom; Drevená dyha; Iné
en: Surfboard construction: Carbon composite; EPS/epoxy; Fiberglass; Inflatable; PU/polyester; PVC sandwich; Soft-top foam; Wood veneer; Other
hr-HR: Konstrukcija surf daske: Ugljični kompozit; EPS/epoksi; Stakloplastika; Na napuhavanje; PU/poliester; PVC sendvič; Mekana pjenasta površina (Soft-top); Drveni furnir; Ostalo
bg-BG: Конструкция на сърф дъска: Въглероден композит; EPS/епоксидна смола; Фибростъкло; Надуваема; PU/полиестер; PVC сандвич; Мека пяна (soft-top); Дървен фурнир; Друго
nl: Surfboardconstructie: Carboncomposiet; EPS/epoxy; Glasvezel; Opblaasbaar; PU/polyester; PVC-sandwich; Soft-top-schuim; Houtfineer; Overig
es: Construcción de la tabla de surf: Compuesto de carbono; EPS/Epoxi; Fibra de vidrio; Inflable; PU/Poliéster; Sándwich de PVC; Espuma soft-top; Chapa de madera; Otro
pt-BR: Montagem da prancha de surfe: Composto de carbono; EPS/epóxi; Fibra de vidro; Inflável; PU/poliéster; Sanduíche de PVC; Espuma soft-top; Folheado de madeira; Outras
da: Konstruktion af surfboard: Kulstofkomposit; EPS/epoxy; Glasfiber; Oppusteligt; PU/polyester; PVC-sandwich; Soft-top-skum; Træfiner; Andet
ja: サーフボード構造: カーボンコンポジット; EPS/エポキシ; ファイバーグラス; インフレータブル; PU/ポリエステル; PVCサンドイッチ; ソフトトップフォーム; ウッドベニヤ; その他
cs: Konstrukce surfu: Karbonový kompozit; EPS/epoxid; Sklolaminát; Nafukovací; PU/polyester; PVC sendvič; Pěna (soft-top); Dřevěná dýha; Jiné
lt-LT: Banglentės konstrukcija: Anglies kompozitas; EPS / epoksidas; Stiklo pluoštas; Pripučiama; PU / poliesteris; PVC sluoksniuota konstrukcija; Minkštas putplasčio paviršius; Medžio fanera; Kita
el: Κατασκευή σανίδας του σερφ: Σύνθετο υλικό από ανθρακόνημα; EPS/Εποξικό; Fiberglass; Φουσκωτή; PU/Πολυεστέρας; Στρώσεις PVC (τύπου σάντουιτς); Αφρώδες υλικό soft-top; Καπλαμάς; Άλλο
tr: Sörf tahtası yapısı: Karbon kompozit; EPS/epoksi; Cam elyafı; Şişirilebilir; PU/polyester; PVC sandviç; Yumuşak üst yüzeyli köpük; Ahşap kaplama; Diğer
pl: Konstrukcja deski surfingowej: Kompozyt węglowy; EPS/epoksyd; Włókno szklane; Pompowana; PU/poliester; Konstrukcja przekładkowa PVC; Pianka (soft top); Fornir drewniany; Inne
hu: Szörfdeszka kialakítása: Karbon kompozit; EPS/epoxi; Üvegszál; Felfújható; PU/poliészter; PVC szendvicsszerkezet; Soft-top hab; Fafurnér; Egyéb
zh-CN: 冲浪板结构: 碳复合材料; EPS/环氧树脂; 玻璃纤维; 充气; PU/聚酯; PVC 夹层; 软顶泡沫; 木饰面; 其他
ko: 서프보드 구조: 카본 복합재; EPS/에폭시; 파이버글라스; 공기 주입식; PU/폴리에스테르; PVC 샌드위치; 소프트탑 폼; 우드 베니어; 기타
th: โครงสร้างของกระดานโต้คลื่น: คาร์บอนคอมโพสิต; EPS/อีพ็อกซี; ไฟเบอร์กลาส; เป่าลม; PU/โพลีเอสเตอร์; PVC แซนด์วิช; โฟมซอฟต์ท็อป; ไม้วีเนียร์; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Construção da prancha de surf: Composto de carbono; EPS/epóxi; Fibra de vidro; Insuflável; PU/poliéster; Construção em sanduíche de PVC; Espuma com topo macio; Folheado de madeira; Outro
it: Costruzione della tavola da surf: Composito in carbonio; EPS/Epossidica; Fibra di vetro; Gonfiabile; PU/Poliestere; PVC sandwich; Schiuma soft-top; Impiallacciatura in legno; Altro
nb: Konstruksjon i surfebrett: Karbonkompositt; EPS/epoksy; Glassfiber; Oppblåsbar; PU/polyester; PVC-sandwich; Myk skumtopp; Trefinér; Annet
vi: Kết cấu của ván lướt sóng: Carbon composite; EPS/epoxy; Sợi thủy tinh; Bơm hơi; PU/polyester; Sandwich PVC; Mút mềm bề mặt; Gỗ veneer; Khác
sl-SI: Izdelava deske za surfanje: Karbonski kompozit; EPS / epoksi; Steklena vlakna; Napihljivo; PU / poliester; PVC sendvič konstrukcija; Pena (soft-top); Leseni furnir; Drugo
fr: Fabrication de planches de surf: Composite de carbone; EPS/époxy; Fibre de verre; Gonflable; PU/polyester; Sandwich PVC; Mousse soft-top; Placage de bois; Autre
sv: Konstruktion för surfbräda: Kolkomposit; EPS/epoxi; Glasfiber; Uppblåsbar; PU/polyester; PVC-sandwich; Mjukskum (soft-top); Träfanér; Övrigt